Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2444
Person, defined.

Person shall mean any individual, corporation, partnership, limited liability company, unincorporated association, or other entity.

Laws 1988, LB 1110, § 14;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 161.